Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2579.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; free school meals; intent A. The sum of $4,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to provide free school meals for children who meet the income eligibility requirements for free and reduced-price lunches under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793). B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.